Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part of  ORS 197A.230 to
197A.250.
SECTION 2. On or before January 1, 2026, the Land Conservation and Development
Commission shall amend its rules related to the prioritization of lands being added to an
urban reserve in order to allow local governments to:
(1) Give a lower priority to the inclusion of lands  within an exception area approved un-
der ORS 197.732 or nonresource lands containing planned developments or  subdivisions
compared to other nonresource lands or lands within an exception area.
(2) Give a lower priority to the inclusion of  otherwise higher priority lands where pro-
viding urban services, as defined  in ORS 195.065, is not reasonable or cost effective due to
topographical or other physical constraints.
SECTION 3.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1129 (SB 1129-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate April 17, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House May 15, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1129 (SB 1129-A) Page 2